Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,311
Act, how construed.

Nothing in the Nebraska Environmental Response Act precludes the director or department from taking any other action allowed by law, including seeking enforcement for injunctive relief or seeking civil or criminal penalties for any violation that may have occurred.

Laws 2022, LB1102, § 11.